Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.36.050

Not subject to assessments—Liability of holders.

Such capital notes or debentures shall in no case be subject to any assessment. The holders of such capital notes or debentures shall not be held individually responsible, as such holders, for any debts, contracts or engagements of such institution, and as such holders, shall not be held liable for assessments to restore impairments in the capital of such institution.

[ 1955 c 33 s 30.36.050. Prior: 1935 c 42 s 5; RRS s 3295-5. Formerly RCW 30.36.050.]